Maryland, session 2026, SB0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
14 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
15 Article – Criminal Procedure
16 10–402.
17 THE MARYLAND JUDICIARY CASE SEARCH MAY NOT IN ANY WAY REFER TO
18 THE EXISTENCE OF RECORDS RELATING TO AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0310*

2 SENATE BILL 310
1 MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW OR ANY OTHER TRAFFIC LAW, ORDINANCE, OR
2 REGULATION BY A MINOR.
3 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
4 October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.